District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.32

Small business enterprises.

(a)

A business enterprise shall be eligible for certification as a small business enterprise if the business enterprise:

(1)

(A)

Is a local business enterprise;

(B)

Repealed.

(2)

Is independently owned, operated, and controlled; and

(3)

(A)

Is certified by the United States Small Business Administration as a small business concern or meets the definition of a small business concern under the Small Business Act, approved July 18, 1958 (72 Stat. 863; 15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq.); or

(B)

Has had averaged annualized gross receipts for the 3 years preceding certification not exceeding the limits established by rules issued pursuant to § 2-218.72.

(b)

A business enterprise that is affiliated with another business enterprise through common ownership, management, or control shall be eligible for certification as a small business enterprise if:

(1)

The business enterprise seeking certification as a small business enterprise is a local business enterprise;

(2)

The consolidated financial statements of the affiliated business enterprises do not exceed the average annualized gross receipt limits established by subsection (a)(3)(B) of this section; and

(3)

In the event of a parent-subsidiary affiliation, the parent company qualifies for certification as a small business enterprise.

(c)

If a business enterprise seeking certification as a small business enterprise is affiliated only with one or more business enterprises that are in a different line of business, subsection (b) of this section shall not apply, and the business enterprise shall be eligible for certification as a small business enterprise if it meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2332, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2132(b), 53 DCR 6899
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(j), 61 DCR 3892
This section is referenced in § 2-218.02 and § 2-218.38.
D.C. Law 16-192 repealed subsec. (a)(1)(B); and, in subsec. (b)(1), deleted “or a qualified metropolitan area business enterprise” following “local business enterprise”. Prior to repeal, subsec. (a)(1)(B) read as follows: “(B) Is a qualified metropolitan area business enterprise;”
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 deleted “or” from the end of (a)(1)(A); added “or meets the definition of a small business concern” in (a)(3)(A); and rewrote (a)(3)(B).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2332 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(b) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108:

Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.